Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.090

Partnership with the University of Washington and Washington State University—Community outreach and engagement to increase participation by underrepresented communities—Grants.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the University of Washington and Washington State University may partner with the Andy Hill cancer research endowment, the department of health, community-based organizations, and other entities to increase the participation of persons who are members of underrepresented demographic groups in clinical trials for drugs or medical devices. If an investigator at the University of Washington or Washington State University is conducting or planning to conduct a clinical trial on a drug or medical device and the university determines that the trial would benefit from specific community outreach and engagement to increase participation of an underrepresented community in the clinical trial, the University of Washington or Washington State University may:

(a) Request the assistance of the department of health and the Andy Hill cancer research endowment to create an outreach plan and coordinate with community-based organizations to provide outreach and engagement; and

(b) Provide the Andy Hill cancer research endowment and the department of health with the following information:

(i) A summary of the clinical trial, including a description of the drug or medical device and any condition or disease that the clinical trial is addressing or targeting;

(ii) Any information on health disparities related to the condition, disease, or related drugs or medical devices, including any demographic groups that may be disproportionately impacted; and

(iii) Any other information that may assist the Andy Hill cancer research endowment, department of health, and community-based organizations in providing outreach and engagement to specific demographic groups or communities.

(2) The requesting university, the Andy Hill cancer research endowment, and the department of health, in collaboration with community-based organizations and other appropriate entities, shall develop a specific community outreach and engagement plan to increase participation of an underrepresented demographic group or community in the clinical trial.

(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Andy Hill cancer research endowment may administer grants to Washington state community-based organizations to implement the outreach plan and to provide meaningful and real-time community engagement with any demographic groups or communities identified in subsection (1) of this section with the goal of increasing the demographic group's or community's participation in the clinical trial. The community engagement should utilize any recommendations provided by the department of health's report required under section 6, chapter 426, Laws of 2023.

[ 2023 c 426 s 7.]